Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.535

Reports.

The department shall annually report to the governor and the legislature on the findings of the longitudinal study undertaken to examine and monitor the effectiveness of early childhood educational and assistance services for eligible children to measure, among other elements, if possible, how the average level of performance of children completing this program compare to the average level of performance of all state students in their grade level, and to the average level of performance of those eligible students who did not have access to this program. The evaluation system shall examine how the percentage of these children needing access to special education or remedial programs compares to the overall percentage of children needing such services and compares to the percentage of eligible students who did not have access to this program needing such services.

[ 1995 c 335 s 501; 1994 c 166 s 9; 1988 c 174 s 8; 1985 c 418 s 8. Formerly RCW 43.215.435, 28A.215.170, 28A.34A.080.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Effective date—1994 c 166: See note following RCW 43.216.500.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.